District of Columbia statutes.
31-1375.01

Regulations.

The Commissioner may, in accordance with § 2-505, promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 501, 50 DCR 330

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-1371.02, § 31-1372.10, § 31-1373.11, and § 31-3931.07.